Washington statutes.
RCW 41.26.730

Joint committee on pension policy—Pension funding council.

The joint committee on pension policy established in *RCW 44.44.050, and the pension funding council created in RCW 41.45.100, shall have no applicability or authority over matters relating to this plan.

[ 2003 c 2 s 7 (Initiative Measure No. 790, approved November 5, 2002).]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 44.44.050 was repealed by 2003 c 295 s 15.